Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-672.08
Assessments, levy.

After the equalization of such special assessments as herein required, the same shall be levied by the mayor and city council upon all lots or parcels of real property within the storm water sewer district, specifically benefited by reason of said improvement. The same may be relevied if, for any reason, the levy thereof is void or not enforceable and in an amount not exceeding the previous levy. Such levy shall be enforced as special assessments for street improvements are enforced in cities of the first class, and any payments thereon, made under previous levies, shall be credited to the property involved. All assessments made for such purposes shall be collected in the same manner as general taxes and shall be subject to the same penalties.

Laws 1961, c. 46, § 8, p. 181.